Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-903
Members; meetings; officers, terms of office.

The commissioners shall meet at least once in two years and shall organize by the election of one of their number as chairman and another as secretary, who shall hold their respective offices for a term of two years and until their successors are elected.

Laws 1951, c. 166, § 3, p. 650.